Hawaii statutes.
§269-106 Billing periods; twelve-month
reconciliation. (a) Billing of net energy metering customers shall be on
a monthly basis; provided that the last monthly bill for each twelve-month
period shall reconcile for that twelve-month period the net electricity
provided by the electric utility with:

(1) The
electricity generated by the eligible customer-generator and fed back to the
electric grid over the monthly billing period; and

(2) Any
unused credits for excess electricity from the eligible customer-generator
carried over from prior months since the last twelve-month reconciliation
period.

(b) Credits for excess electricity from the
eligible customer-generator that remain unused after each twelve-month
reconciliation period may not be carried over to the next twelve-month period.
[L 2001, c 272, pt of §6; am L 2005, c 104, §6]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next